District of Columbia statutes.
44-1511

Power to alter, amend or repeal provisions.

Congress shall have power to alter, amend, or repeal §§ 44-1501 to 44-1507 at any time.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 159, ch. 135, § 8

History

1981 Ed., § 32-911.
1973 Ed., § 32-211.

Prior Codifications